apertium-oci.oci.metadix
<!-- no en fitxer forms          -->    
        <pardef n="capitan/i__n">            
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>es</l><r>i<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>            
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>es</l><r>i<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>            
    <e alt="oci"><p><l>as</l><r>i<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                        
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>i<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>            
      <e><p><l>is</l><r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                        
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>    
    </pardef>
         
        <pardef n="presoniè/r__n">                 
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>res</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                 
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>res</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                 
      <e r="LR"><p><l>iras</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                 
    <e alt="oci"><p><l>ras</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                                  
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                 
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ira</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                 
      <e><p><l>rs</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                                  
      <e><p><l>r</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>    
    </pardef>
                  
        <pardef n="lo/p__n">                 
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>bes</l><r>p<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                 
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>bes</l><r>p<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                 
    <e alt="oci"><p><l>bas</l><r>p<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                                  
      <e><p><l>ba</l><r>p<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                 
      <e><p><l>ps</l><r>p<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                                  
      <e><p><l>p</l><r>p<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>    
    </pardef>
         
        <pardef n="afilia/t__n">                 
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>des</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                 
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>des</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                 
    <e alt="oci"><p><l>das</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                                  
      <e><p><l>da</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                 
      <e><p><l>ts</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                                  
      <e><p><l>t</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>    
    </pardef>
<!-- no en fitxer forms          -->         
        <pardef n="frai/r__n">                 
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>es</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                 
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>es</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                 
    <e alt="oci"><p><l>as</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                                  
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                 
      <e><p><l>rs</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                                  
      <e><p><l>r</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>    
    </pardef>
         
        <pardef n="ami/c__n">                 
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>gues</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                 
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>gues</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                 
    <e alt="oci"><p><l>gas</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                                  
      <e><p><l>ga</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                 
      <e><p><l>cs</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                                  
      <e><p><l>c</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>         
    </pardef>
                  
        <pardef n="sindi/c__n">                 
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>ques</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                 
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>ques</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                 
    <e alt="oci"><p><l>cas</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                                  
      <e><p><l>ca</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                 
      <e><p><l>cs</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                                  
      <e><p><l>c</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>         
    </pardef>
         
        <pardef n="ris/c__n">                 
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>qui</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>qui</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
    <e alt="oci"><p><l>ques</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                 
      <e><p><l>c</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>         
    </pardef>
<!-- no en fitxer forms          -->         
        <pardef n="joen__n">                 
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>es</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                 
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>es</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                 
    <e alt="oci"><p><l>as</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                                  
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                 
      <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                  
      <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                                  
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>    
    </pardef>
                  
        <pardef n="filosòf__n">                 
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>es</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                 
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>es</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                 
    <e alt="oci"><p><l>as</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                                  
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                 
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                 
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                 
    <e alt="oci" r="LR"><p><l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                  
    <e alt="oci"><p><l>es</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                                  
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>    
    </pardef>
                  
        <pardef n="propriet/ari__n">                 
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>àries</l><r>ari<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                 
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>àries</l><r>ari<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                 
    <e alt="oci"><p><l>àrias</l><r>ari<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                                  
      <e><p><l>ària</l><r>ari<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                 
      <e><p><l>aris</l><r>ari<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                                  
      <e><p><l>ari</l><r>ari<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>         
    </pardef>
                   

    <e lm="mercenari" a="carmentano"><i>mercen</i><par n="propriet/ari__n"/></e>
    <e lm="adjudicatari"><i>adjudicat</i><par n="propriet/ari__n"/></e>
    <e lm="amic"><i>ami</i><par n="ami/c__n"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="retirat" alt="oci@gascon"><i>retira</i><par n="afilia/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="magistrat"><i>magistra</i><par n="afilia/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="soldat"><i>solda</i><par n="afilia/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bandit"><i>bandi</i><par n="afilia/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beneficiari"><i>benefici</i><par n="propriet/ari__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bòsc"><i>bòs</i><par n="ris/c__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bròc"><i>brò</i><par n="ris/c__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chilenc" a="carmentano"><i>chilen</i><par n="sindi/c__n"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="clèsc" alt="oci@aran"><i>clès</i><par n="ris/c__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cunhat"><i>cunha</i><par n="afilia/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="detengut"><i>detengu</i><par n="afilia/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="presonièr" r="LR"><i>presoniè</i><par n="presoniè/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="empresari" alt="oci@aran"><i>empres</i><par n="propriet/ari__n"/></e>
    <e lm="entretòc"><i>entretò</i><par n="ris/c__n"/></e>
    <e lm="foncionari"><i>foncion</i><par n="propriet/ari__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fotògraf"><i>fotògraf</i><par n="filosòf__n"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="frair" alt="oci"><i>frai</i><par n="frai/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="frair" alt="oci@aran"><i>frai</i><par n="frai/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="frair" alt="oci@gascon"><i>frai</i><par n="frai/r__n"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="hic" alt="oci"><i>hi</i><par n="ris/c__n"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="caireforc" alt="oci@aran"><i>cairefor</i><par n="ris/c__n"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="fustièr" alt="oci@aran"><i>fustiè</i><par n="presoniè/r__n"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="joen" alt="oci"><i>joen</i><par n="joen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="joen" alt="oci@aran"><i>joen</i><par n="joen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="joen" alt="oci@gascon"><i>joen</i><par n="joen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lop"><i>lo</i><par n="lo/p__n"/></e>
    <e lm="music" a="carmentano" r="LR"><i>musi</i><par n="sindi/c__n"/></e>
    <e lm="naric"><i>nari</i><par n="ris/c__n"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="herit" alt="oci"><i>heri</i><par n="afilia/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="herit" alt="oci@gascon"><i>heri</i><par n="afilia/t__n"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="ferit" alt="oci@gascon"><i>feri</i><par n="afilia/t__n"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="obrièr" alt="oci@gascon"><i>obriè</i><par n="presoniè/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="passatgièr" a="carmentano" alt="oci"><i>passatgiè</i><par n="presoniè/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ramadièr" r="LR"><i>ramadiè</i><par n="presoniè/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rebrèc" r="LR"><i>rebrè</i><par n="ris/c__n"/></e>
    <e lm="secretari"><i>secret</i><par n="propriet/ari__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sindic"><i>sindi</i><par n="sindi/c__n"/></e>
    <e lm="síndic" r="LR"><i>síndi</i><par n="sindi/c__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trinc"><i>trin</i><par n="ris/c__n"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="usatgièr" alt="oci@gascon"><i>usatgiè</i><par n="presoniè/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="traïdor"><i>traïdo</i><par n="presoniè/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="enemic"><i>enemi</i><par n="ami/c__n"/></e>
    <e lm="notari" a="carmentano"><i>not</i><par n="propriet/ari__n"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="capitani" a="carmentano" alt="oci@aran"><i>capitan</i><par n="capitan/i__n"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="capitani" a="carmentano" alt="oci@gascon"><i>capitan</i><par n="capitan/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="capitani" a="carmentano" alt="oci"><i>capitan</i><par n="capitan/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mandatari" a="carmentano"><i>mandat</i><par n="propriet/ari__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cavalièr" a="carmentano"><i>cavaliè</i><par n="presoniè/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="filosòf" a=" mmonge"><i>filosòf</i><par n="filosòf__n"/></e>
    <e lm="catedratic" a="carmentano"><i>catedrati</i><par n="sindi/c__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nauvengut" a="mmonge"><i>nauvengu</i><par n="afilia/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="farmaceutic" a="mmonge"><i>farmaceuti</i><par n="sindi/c__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cèc" a="carmentano"><i>cè</i><par n="ami/c__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cèc" a="carmentano"><i>cè</i><par n="ami/c__n"/></e>
    <e lm="infermièr" a="carmentano"><i>infermiè</i><par n="presoniè/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="coreograf" a=" mmonge"><i>coreograf</i><par n="filosòf__n"/></e>
    <e lm="exconselhièr" alt="oci" a=" mmonge"><i>exconselhiè</i><par n="presoniè/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bibliotecari"><i>bibliotec</i><par n="propriet/ari__n"/></e>
